Utah statutes.
39-1-31.   Commissions to officers -- Relative rank.
Commissions shall be issued under the seal of the adjutant general, signed by
the governor and countersigned by the adjutant general. They may be vacated in
such manner as is now or shall hereafter be provided by law in regard to
commissions of the regular army or regular air force and the National Guard of
the United States. The relative rank of officers of the same grade shall be
determined by length of service in that grade, whether continuous or not, and
if the length of service of two or more officers is the same, their rank shall
be determined by lot.
